District of Columbia statutes.
5-117.03

Examination of property pledged to pawnbroker.

Any member of the police force, when thereto authorized in writing by the Chief of Police, and having in his possession a pawnbroker’s receipt or ticket, shall be allowed to examine the property purporting to be pawned or pledged, or deposited upon said receipt or ticket, in whosesoever possession said property may be; but no such property shall be taken from the possessor thereof without due process or authority of law.

R.S., D.C., § 406
Office of Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-105.01.
1973 Ed., § 4-149.
1981 Ed., § 4-149.
This section is referenced in § 47-2884.01.
Pawned or pledged property, search and seizure, see § 47-2884.11.
Pawnbrokers “defined”, see § 47-2884.01.